South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H5007.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Chapter 1, Title 39 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 39-1-100.  (A) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, if a residential real property that includes a heating, ventilation, and air-conditioning (HVAC) system as a fixture to the property is conveyed to a new owner after June 30, 2026, a manufacturer's warranty in effect on that system or a component of that system: (1) is automatically transferred to the new owner; and (2) continues in effect as if the new owner was the original purchaser of such system or component, as applicable. (B) A warrantor continues to be obligated under the terms of a manufacturer's warranty agreement for a warranty transferred pursuant to this section and may not charge a fee for the transfer of the warranty. (C) The transfer of a manufacturer's warranty pursuant to this section does not extend the remaining term of the warranty. (D) A manufacturer's warranty of an HVAC system or a component of the system may not be in any way conditioned upon the product registration. (E) This section applies if: (1) a sale of a residential property that includes an HVAC system as a fixture to the property occurs after June 30, 2026; and (2) a manufacturer's warranty is still in effect on the HVAC system or a component of the system. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----